Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 33. Apportionment of State Senators

§ 1881.
Number to be elected.

Senatorial districts and the number of Senators to be elected from each are as follows:

Addison Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Addison, Bridport, Bristol, Buel’s Gore, Cornwall, Ferrisburgh, Goshen, Granville, Hancock, Huntington, Leicester, Lincoln, Middlebury, Monkton, New Haven, Orwell, Panton, Rochester, Ripton, Salisbury, Shoreham, Starksboro, Vergennes, Waltham, Weybridge, and Whiting ........ two;

Bennington Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Arlington, Bennington, Dorset, Glastenbury, Landgrove, Londonderry, Manchester, Peru, Pownal, Readsboro, Rupert, Sandgate, Searsburg, Shaftsbury, Somerset, Stamford, Stratton, Sunderland, Wilmington, Winhall, and Woodford ........ two;

Caledonia Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Barnet, Danville, Groton, Hardwick, Newbury, Peacham, Ryegate, St. Johnsbury, Stannard, Walden, Waterford, and Wheelock ................ one;

Chittenden-Central Senatorial District, composed of the city of Winooski, that portion of the town of Essex not included in Chittenden-North Senatorial District, that portion of the town of Colchester not included in Grand Isle Senatorial District, and that portion of the city of Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the eastern boundary line of the city of Burlington intersects with the South Burlington Recreation Path; then westerly along the northern side of the boundary between the South Burlington Recreation Path and the Burlington Country Club to where the South Burlington Recreation Path turns north; then continuing westerly along the northern side of the property boundary of the Burlington Country Club to the property boundary line between 544 South Prospect Street and 500 South Prospect Street; then westerly along the northern side of the property line between 544 South Prospect Street and 500 Prospect Street to where it intersects with South Prospect Street; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of South Prospect Street to the intersection of Cliff Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Cliff Street to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then briefly northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Spruce Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Spruce Street to the intersection of South Union Street; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of South Union Street to the intersection of Adams Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Adams Street to the intersection of South Winooski Avenue; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of South Winooski Avenue to the intersection of Maple Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Maple Street to the end of Maple Street; then continuing on a line due west across Lake Champlain to the boundary of the city of South Burlington in Lake Champlain; then northerly along the city line of South Burlington in Lake Champlain and continuing along the city line of South Burlington as it follows the eastern shore of Lake Champlain to the boundary of the town of Colchester; then northerly and then southeasterly along the town line of Colchester to the boundary of the city of Winooski; then southeasterly along the city line of Winooski to the boundary of the city of South Burlington; then southwesterly along the city line of South Burlington to the point of beginning......... three;

Chittenden-North Senatorial District, composed of towns of Fairfax, Milton, Westford, and that portion of the town of Essex encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the western boundary line of the town of Essex intersects with VT Route 2A; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of VT Route 2A to the intersection of Gentes Road; then briefly easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Gentes Road to where it intersects with the railroad tracks before Lamore Road; then southerly along the eastern side of the railroad tracks to where they intersect with VT Route 289; then southeasterly along the northeastern side of the centerline of VT Route 289 to the intersection of Upper Main Street; then northeasterly along the northwestern side of the centerline of Upper Main Street to the intersection of Center Road; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Center Road to the intersection of Jericho Road; then southeasterly along the northeastern side of the centerline of Jericho Road to the intersection of Allen Martin Drive; then southwesterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of Allen Martin Road to the intersection of Sandhill Road; then southerly along the eastern side of Sandhill Road to the intersection of River Road; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of River Road to where it intersects with Alder Brook; then southerly along the eastern side of Alder Brook to the boundary of the town of Williston; then easterly along the town line of Williston to the boundary of the town of Jericho; then northeasterly along the town line of Jericho to the boundary of the town of Westford; then westerly along the town line of Westford to the boundary of the town of Colchester; then southerly along the town line of Colchester to the point of beginning......... one;

Chittenden-Southeast Senatorial District, composed of towns of Bolton, Charlotte, Hinesburg, Jericho, Richmond, Shelburne, South Burlington, St. George, Underhill, Williston, and that portion of the city of Burlington not included in Chittenden-Central Senatorial District.......three;

Essex Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Averill, Avery’s Gore, Bloomfield, Brighton, Brunswick, Canaan, Concord, Derby, East Haven, Ferdinand, Granby, Guildhall, Holland, Kirby, Lemington, Lewis, Lunenburg, Lyndon, Maidstone, Morgan, Newport City, Norton, Victory, Warner’s Grant, and Warren Gore,................ one;

Franklin Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Alburgh, Bakersfield, Berkshire, Enosburgh, Fairfield, Franklin, Georgia, Highgate, Richford, St. Albans City, St. Albans Town, Sheldon, and Swanton ................ two;

Grand Isle Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Grand Isle, Isle La Motte, North Hero, South Hero, and that portion of the town of Colchester encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the southern boundary line of Colchester and the northern boundary of the city of Winooski intersects with U.S. Route 7; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Hercules Drive; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Hercules Drive; then continue southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Hercules Drive to the intersection of Vermont National Guard Road; then southeasterly along the northeastern side of the centerline of Vermont National Guard Road to the intersection of Hegeman Avenue; then northeasterly along the northwestern side of the centerline of Hegeman Avenue to the intersection of Barnes Avenue; then briefly northwesterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of Barnes Avenue to the intersection of Troy Avenue; then northeasterly along the northwestern side of the centerline of Troy Avenue to where it joins Hegeman Avenue; then briefly southeasterly along the northeastern side of the centerline of Hegeman Avenue to the intersection of Vermont Avenue; then briefly easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Vermont Avenue to where it intersects with the boundary of the town of Essex; then northeasterly along the town line of Essex to the boundary of the town of Milton; then northwesterly along the town line of Milton to the boundary of the town of South Hero; then southwesterly along the town line of South Hero to the state border of New York; then southerly along the state border of New York to the boundary of the city of South Burlington in Lake Champlain; then easterly along the city line of South Burlington to the boundary of the city of Burlington; then easterly along the city line of Burlington to the boundary of the city of Winooski; then northeasterly along the city line of Winooski; then continue along the city line of Winooski to the point of beginning................ one;

Lamoille Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Belvidere, Cambridge, Eden, Elmore, Fletcher, Hyde Park, Johnson, Morristown, Waterville, and Wolcott................ one;

Orange Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Bradford, Brookfield, Chelsea, Corinth, Fairlee, Randolph, Strafford, Topsham, Tunbridge, Vershire, Washington, West Fairlee, and Williamstown ................ one;

Orleans Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Albany, Barton, Brownington, Burke, Charleston, Coventry, Craftsbury, Glover, Greensboro, Irasburg, Jay, Lowell, Montgomery, Newport Town, Newark, Sheffield, Sutton, Troy, Westfield, and Westmore ................ one;

Rutland Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Benson, Brandon, Castleton, Chittenden, Clarendon, Danby, Fair Haven, Hubbardton, Ira, Killington, Mendon, Middletown Springs, Mt. Holly, Mt. Tabor, Pawlet, Pittsford, Poultney, Proctor, Rutland City, Rutland Town, Shrewsbury, Sudbury, Tinmouth, Wallingford, Wells, West Haven, and West Rutland ................ three;

Washington Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Barre City, Barre Town, Berlin, Braintree, Cabot, Calais, Duxbury, East Montpelier, Fayston, Marshfield, Middlesex, Montpelier, Moretown, Northfield, Orange, Plainfield, Roxbury, Stowe, Waitsfield, Warren, Waterbury, Woodbury, and Worcester ................ three;

Windham Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Athens, Brattleboro, Brookline, Dover, Dummerston, Grafton, Guilford, Halifax, Jamaica, Marlboro, Newfane, Putney, Rockingham, Townshend, Vernon, Wardsboro, Westminster, Whitingham, and Windham ................ two;

Windsor Senatorial District, composed of the towns of Andover, Baltimore, Barnard, Bethel, Bridgewater, Cavendish, Chester, Hartford, Hartland, Ludlow, Norwich, Pittsfield, Plymouth, Pomfret, Reading, Royalton, Sharon, Springfield, Stockbridge, Thetford, Weathersfield, Weston, West Windsor, Windsor, and Woodstock ................ three.

HISTORY:

Amended

1962, No. 5

(Sp. Sess.), § 1, eff. Aug. 9, 1962;

1965, No. 96

, § 1;

1971, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.);

1973, No. 80

, § 1, eff. June 1, 1973, see note set out below;

1981, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 1982, see note set out below;

1991, No. 217

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 22, 1992;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 52, eff. June 27, 2002;

2011, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 1, 2012;

2021, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, effective April 6, 2022.

§ 1881a.
Senatorial districts; nominations and election.

The laws relating to the election of Senators in single counties shall apply in senatorial districts except as their application may be inconsistent with this section or the structure of those districts.

In senatorial districts, the senatorial district clerk shall be the county clerk for those towns within the district aggregating the largest population.

Petitions for nominating candidates for Senator in the General Assembly by primary or by certificates of nomination of candidates for that office by convention, caucus, committee, or voters under chapter 49 of this title may be filed in the office of any county clerk in a senatorial district.
(c) (1) Petitions for nominating candidates for Senator in the General Assembly by primary or by certificates of nomination of candidates for that office by convention, caucus, committee, or voters under chapter 49 of this title may be filed in the office of any county clerk in a senatorial district.

On the day after the last day for filing those petitions or certificates for that office, the other county clerk shall notify the senatorial district clerk of the facts concerning those petitions or certificates.
(2) (A) On the day after the last day for filing those petitions or certificates for that office, the other county clerk shall notify the senatorial district clerk of the facts concerning those petitions or certificates.

The senatorial district clerk shall be responsible for determining the names of candidates and other facts required by law to appear on the ballot for the office of Senator and for obtaining and distributing the ballots to the other clerks in the district.

The clerk of the less populous county in a senatorial district shall report the results of voting in his or her county immediately after they are determined to the senatorial district clerk, who shall issue the certificates of nomination or election required by law as to the office of Senator.

The canvassing of votes in a senatorial district shall be done in each county in the district as in the case of single counties, but the clerk of the less populous county in a senatorial district shall send a copy of the appropriate certificate to the clerk of the senatorial district who shall issue necessary certificates for the senatorial district.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 187

, § 2; amended

1975, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 69;

2019, No. 67

, § 2.